Illinois, session 104th, HB2513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois is amended by changing Section 805-72 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 805/805-72)8    Sec. 805-72. Lyme Disease Innovation Program.9    (a) The Department shall consult with the Department of 10Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, and members of 11the University of Illinois' INHS Medical Entomology Program to 12establish the Lyme Disease Innovation Program no later than 13one year after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14103rd General Assembly. The Department shall contract with an 15Illinois not-for-profit organization whose purpose is to raise 16awareness of tick-borne diseases with the public and the 17medical community to operate the Program. The Program's 18purpose is to raise awareness with the public and to assist 19persons at risk of Lyme disease and other tick-borne diseases 20with education and awareness materials and campaigns while 21developing evidence-based approaches that are cost-effective.22    (b) The Program shall implement a statewide interagency 23and multipronged approach to combat Lyme disease and other   HB2513- 2 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1tick-borne diseases in Illinois, including adopting an 2evidence-based model that recognizes the key roles that 3patients, advocates, and not-for-profit organizations have in 4fighting Lyme disease and tick-borne diseases. The Program's 5objectives include issuing grants, subject to the approval of 6the Department, to State agencies and Illinois not-for profit 7organizations from moneys in the Lyme Disease Awareness Fund, 8which is hereby established as a special fund in the State 9treasury, and other appropriations for the following purposes:10        (1) Bringing awareness of Lyme disease and tick-borne 11    diseases by any one or more of the following methods:12            (A) creating innovative ideas and collaborations 13        for raising awareness about risks and prevention;14            (B) amplifying and improving access to essential 15        information supporting innovations in prevention, 16        education, and care with open data and science;17            (C) fostering the development of new, 18        community-based education and prevention efforts; and19            (D) using programs, website advertising, 20        pamphlets, or other methods to increase the awareness 21        of Lyme disease and tick-borne diseases;22        (2) Engaging stakeholders to facilitate 23    patient-centered innovations by (i) building trust among 24    stakeholders through listening sessions, roundtables, and 25    other learning approaches that ground innovations in lived 26    experience, (ii) engaging stakeholders in identifying   HB2513- 3 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1    current areas of need to promote targeted innovations that 2    will make real-world improvements in quality of care, and 3    (iii) gaining insight into patient needs and priorities 4    through stakeholders' collective wisdom and applying that 5    wisdom in shaping future innovation challenges and events.6        (3) Advancing stakeholder driven interdisciplinary and 7    interagency collaborations by providing resources to 8    not-for-profit organizations whose purpose is to raise 9    awareness of tick-borne diseases with the public and the 10    medical community in order to (i) facilitate the 11    stakeholder engagement and collaborations and 12    patient-centered innovations and support groups, (ii) 13    identify ways to better collect and share data while 14    raising awareness of tick-borne illnesses, and (iii) 15    assist with the development of outreach and education 16    materials and approaches for State agencies.17        (4) The University of Illinois' INHS Medical 18    Entomology Program maintaining a passive tick and 19    tick-borne pathogen surveillance program, based on ticks 20    contributed by the Illinois public, and including tick 21    identifications and disease-agent testing of a subset of 22    identified ticks; compiling evidence and conducting 23    research on tick bite prevention and risk of tick and 24    tick-borne pathogen exposure; and providing evidence, 25    results, and analysis and insight from both the passive 26    surveillance program, on tick species and tick-borne   HB2513- 4 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1    disease-agent distributions and diversity in the State, 2    and its related research on tick bite exposure and 3    prevention, to support the Lyme Disease Innovation Program 4    objectives.5    (c) The Program shall be funded through moneys deposited 6into the Lyme Disease Awareness Fund, including revenue from 7the Lyme Disease Innovation scratch-off game, and other 8appropriations. The not-for-profit organization contracted 9with to operate the Program shall be paid, subject to the 10approval of the Department, for its operation of the Program 11from moneys deposited into the Fund or from other 12appropriations.13    The University of Illinois' Prairie Research Institute 14shall be paid, subject to the approval of the Department, for 15the INHS Medical Entomology Program's operation of a passive 16tick surveillance and research program from moneys deposited 17into the Fund or from other appropriations.18    (d) The Department must adopt rules to implement this 19Section. 20    (e) The requirements of this Section are subject to 21appropriation by the General Assembly being made to the 22Department to implement the requirements. 23(Source: P.A. 103-557, eff. 8-11-23.) 24    Section 10. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by 25changing Sections 9.3, 20, and 21.4 and by adding Section   HB2513- 5 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b121.16.5 as follows: 2    (20 ILCS 1605/9.3)3    Sec. 9.3. Expenditure and distribution of lottery 4proceeds.5    (a) Beginning July 1, 2022, except as provided in Sections 621.4, 21.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 21.11, 21.13, 721.15, and 21.16, and 21.16.5 of this Law and Section 25-70 of 8the Sports Wagering Act, the Department shall distribute all 9proceeds of lottery tickets and shares sold in the following 10priority and manner:11        (1) The payment of prizes and retailer bonuses.12        (2) The payment of costs incurred in the operation and 13    administration of the Lottery, including the payment of 14    sums due to the private manager under the management 15    agreement with the Department and including costs of 16    administering the Lottery sports wagering program pursuant 17    to Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act.18        (3) On the last day of each month or as soon thereafter 19    as possible, the State Comptroller shall direct and the 20    State Treasurer shall transfer from the State Lottery Fund 21    to the Common School Fund the Department's estimate of net 22    lottery proceeds.23        (4) If an amount in excess of the annual net lottery 24    proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then the 25    Department shall offset the monthly transfers of estimated   HB2513- 6 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1    net lottery proceeds during the following fiscal year by 2    that excess amount. If an amount less than the annual net 3    lottery proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then 4    after the related annual fiscal year audit is completed 5    following such fiscal year, the Department shall direct 6    the deposit of any remaining annual net lottery proceeds 7    from such fiscal year, subject to payments under 8    paragraphs (1) and (2), into the Common School Fund as 9    soon thereafter as possible.10    (b) The net lottery proceeds shall be determined by 11deducting from total annual lottery proceeds the expenditures 12required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a). The 13total annual lottery proceeds and annual net lottery proceeds 14shall be determined according to generally accepted accounting 15principles for governmental entities and verified by an annual 16fiscal year audit.17(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 18    (20 ILCS 1605/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170)19    Sec. 20. State Lottery Fund. 20    (a) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund 21to be known as the State Lottery Fund. Such fund shall consist 22of all revenues received from (1) the sale of lottery tickets 23or shares, (net of commissions, fees representing those 24expenses that are directly proportionate to the sale of 25tickets or shares at the agent location, and prizes of less   HB2513- 7 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1than $600 which have been validly paid at the agent level), (2) 2application fees, and (3) all other sources including moneys 3credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or source 4pursuant to law. Interest earnings of the State Lottery Fund 5shall be credited to the Common School Fund.6    (a-5) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 721.4 of this Act shall be in accordance with Section 21.4. 8    (b) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 921.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.5. 10    (c) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1121.6 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.6.12    (d) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1321.7 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.7. 14    (e) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1521.8 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.8. 16    (f) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1721.9 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.9. 18    (g) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1921.10 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.10. 20    (h) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2121.11 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.11. 22    (i) (Blank). 23    (j) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2421.13 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.13.25    (k) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2625-70 of the Sports Wagering Act shall be in accordance with   HB2513- 8 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act. 2    (l) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 321.15 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.15. 4    (m) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 521.16 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.16.6    (n) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 721.16.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 821.16.5.9(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 10    (20 ILCS 1605/21.4)11    Sec. 21.4. Joint Special Instant Scratch-off game.12    (a) The Department shall offer a joint special instant 13scratch-off game for the benefit of the special causes 14identified in Sections 21.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 1521.11, 21.13, 21.15, and 21.16, and 21.16.5. The operation of 16the game shall be governed by this Section and any rules 17adopted by the Department. The game shall commence on January 181, 2024 or as soon thereafter, at the discretion of the 19Director, as is reasonably practical and shall be discontinued 20on January 1, 2027. If any provision of this Section is 21inconsistent with any other provision in the Act, then this 22Section governs.23    (b) Once the joint special instant scratch-off game is 24used to fund a special cause, the game will be used to fund the 25special cause for the remainder of the special causes'   HB2513- 9 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1existence per the causes' respective Section of this Act. 2    (c) New specialty tickets and causes authorized by this 3Act shall be funded by the joint special instant scratch-off 4game. New specialty tickets and causes after February 1, 2024 5must have a sunset date. The Department shall be limited to 6supporting no more than 10 causes in total at any given time. 7    (d) Net revenue received from the sale of the joint 8special instant scratch-off game for the purposes of this 9Section shall be divided equally among the special causes the 10game benefits. At the direction of the Department, the State 11Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 12transfer from the State Lottery Fund the net revenue to the 13specific fund identified for each special cause in accordance 14with the special cause's respective Section in this Act. As 15used in this Section, "net revenue" means the total amount for 16which tickets have been sold less the sum of the amount paid 17out in prizes and to retailers, and direct and estimated 18administrative expenses incurred in operation of the ticket.19(Source: P.A. 103-381, eff. 7-28-23; 103-574, eff. 12-8-23.) 20    (20 ILCS 1605/21.16.5 new)21    Sec. 21.16.5. Scratch-off for Lyme Disease Innovation.22    (a) The Department shall offer a special Lyme Disease 23Innovation instant scratch-off game for the benefit of the 24Illinois-based Lyme Disease Innovation Program. The net 25revenue from the Lyme Disease Innovation scratch-off game   HB2513- 10 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1shall be deposited into the Lyme Disease Awareness Fund, a 2special fund in the State treasury, for the purposes set forth 3in Section 805-72 of the Department of Natural Resources 4(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 5Illinois. The game shall commence on January 1, 2026, or as 6soon thereafter as is reasonably practical, and shall be 7discontinued on December 31, 2035. The Department shall 8consult with the Department of Natural Resources regarding the 9design and promotion of the game. The Department shall offer 10the game enumerated under this Section upon the 11discontinuation of the first game that is discontinued within 12the Joint Special Instant Scratch-Off game that is created 13under Section 21.4 of this law.14    (b) The operation of any games under this Section shall be 15governed by this Act and any rules adopted by the Department 16under this Act.17    (c) In this Section, "net revenue" means the total amount 18for which tickets have been sold less the sum of the amount 19paid out in prizes and the actual administrative expenses of 20the Department solely related to the Lyme Disease Innovation 21scratch-off game.22    (d) During the time that tickets are sold for the Lyme 23Disease Innovation scratch-off game, the Department shall not 24unreasonably diminish the efforts devoted to marketing any 25other instant scratch-off lottery game.26    (e) The Department may adopt any rules necessary to   HB2513- 11 -LRB104 12001 BDA 22096 b1implement and administer this Section.